Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4802
Act; applicability.

The proceedings authorized by the Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act may be applied to:

(1) All insurers who are doing or have done an insurance business in this state and against whom claims arising from that business may exist now or in the future;

(2) All insurers who purport to do an insurance business in this state;

(3) All insurers who have insureds who are residents of this state;

(4) All other persons organized or in the process of organizing with the intent to do an insurance business in this state;

(5) All fraternal benefit societies subject to Chapter 44, article 10;

(6) All title insurers subject to the Title Insurers Act;

(7) All health maintenance organizations subject to the Health Maintenance Organization Act;

(8) All legal service insurance corporations subject to Chapter 44, article 33;

(9) All prepaid dental service corporations subject to Chapter 44, article 38; and

(10) All prepaid limited health service organizations subject to the Prepaid Limited Health Service Organization Act.

Laws 1989, LB 319, § 2;

Laws 1990, LB 984, § 3;

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 111;

Laws 1991, LB 235, § 57;

Laws 1997, LB 53, § 49.

Health Maintenance Organization Act, see section 44-3292.

Prepaid Limited Health Service Organization Act, see section 44-4701.

Title Insurers Act, see section 44-1978.